Mississippi, session 2026, SB2236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-11-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-11-85.  The following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a)  "Cardiac and Choking Emergency Response Plan ( * * *CERP CCERP)" shall mean a written document that establishes the specific steps to reduce death from cardiac arrest and instances in which an individual's airway is blocked due to choking in any setting  be it a school, community organization, workplace, or sports facility. (b)  "Automated External Defibrillator (AED)" shall mean a lightweight, portable device that delivers an electric shock through the chest to the heart.  The shock can potentially stop an irregular heartbeat (arrhythmia) and allow a normal rhythm to resume following sudden cardiac arrest (SCA). (c)  "Sudden Cardiac Arrest (SCA)" means when the heart malfunctions and stops beating unexpectedly, and if not treated within minutes, it quickly leads to death. (d)  "Airway Clearance Device (ACD)" means a portable medical device that uses manually created suction to remove blockage from the airway during a choking emergency and has been registered as a Class I or Class II acute upper airway obstruction device with the United States Food and Drug Administration. SECTION 2.  Section 37-11-87, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-11-87.  (1) Beginning in the * * * 2024‑2025 2026-2027 school year, each public school shall develop a cardiac and choking emergency response plan ( * * *CERP CCERP) that addresses the appropriate use of school personnel to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest, airway obstruction due to choking or a similar life-threatening emergency while on school grounds. (2)  Beginning in the * * * 2024‑2025 2026-2027 school year, each public school with an athletic department or organized athletic program shall develop a cardiac and choking emergency response plan that addresses the appropriate use of school personnel to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest, airway obstruction due to choking or a similar life-threatening emergency while attending or participating in an athletic practice or event while on school grounds. (3)  School officials shall work directly with local emergency service providers to integrate the * * * CERP CCERP into the community's EMS responder protocols.  Each plan shall integrate evidence-based core elements, such as those recommended by the American Heart Association guidelines, the United States Food and Drug Administration or another nationally recognized, evidence-based standard. (4)  The * * * CERP CCERP shall integrate, at a minimum, the following guidelines: (a)  Establishing a cardiac and choking emergency response team; (b)  Activating the team in response to a SCA or a choking emergency; (c)  A plan for implementing AED and ACD placement and routine maintenance within the school; (d)  Disseminating the plan throughout the school campus; (e)  Maintaining ongoing staff training in CPR/AED/ACD use; (f)  Practicing using drills annually; (g)  Integrating local EMS with the plan; and (h)  Ongoing and annual review and evaluation of the plan. (5)  Appropriate AED and ACD placement shall be dictated by the * * * CERP CCERP and in accordance with guidelines set by the American Heart Association, the United States Food and Drug Administration or another nationally recognized, evidence-based standard.  A school or local and regional board of education may accept gifts, grants and donations, including in-kind donations designated for the purchase of an AED and an ACD that meets the standards established by the United States Food and Drug Administration and for the costs incurred to inspect and maintain such device and train staff in the use of such device. (6)  Appropriate school staff shall be trained in first-aid, CPR, * * * and AED use and ACD use that follow evidence-based guidelines set forth by the American Heart Association, the United States Food and Drug Administration or another nationally recognized, evidence-based standard.  Staff trained shall be determined by the * * * CERP CCERP, including, but not limited to, licensed coaches, school nurses and athletic trainers. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.